District of Columbia statutes.
29-810.01

Application to existing relationships.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to a limited liability company formed after the applicability date of this chapter and to a limited liability company that elects, as provided by subsection (c) of this section, to be governed by this chapter.

(b)

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, on and after one year after the applicability date of this chapter, this chapter shall govern all limited liability companies, whenever formed.

(c)

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, after the applicability date of this chapter, a limited liability company voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its operating agreement or by law for amending the operating agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

(d)

For the purposes [of] applying this chapter to a limited liability company formed before the applicability date of this chapter:

(1)

The company’s articles of organization shall be deemed to be the company’s certificate of organization; and

(2)

For the purposes of applying § 29-801.02(10) and subject to § 29-801.09(d), language in the company’s articles of organization designating the company’s management structure operates as if that language were in the operating agreement.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-801.02.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1104 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Editor's Notes